Arkansas, session 2025, HB1871.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-93-309(d), concerning sentence
alternatives upon the revocation of probation or a suspended sentence, is
amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) Following Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2) of this
section, following a revocation hearing in which a defendant is ordered to
continue on a period of suspension of sentence or a period of probation, upon
finding the defendant guilty at a subsequent revocation hearing, the court
may:
(1)(A) Revoke the suspension of sentence or period of
probation; and
(2)(B) Sentence the defendant to incarceration in the
Division of Correction.
*JLL274*
03/20/2025 12:31:57 PM JLL274

HB1871
(2) If a defendant has had his or her probation or suspended
sentence revoked at least three (3) times under this section, upon finding
the defendant guilty at a subsequent revocation hearing, the court shall
sentence the defendant to incarceration in the Division of Correction for a
period of confinement that is at least equal to the term of imprisonment
provided for the offense for which the defendant was on probation or serving
a suspended sentence.





























03/20/2025 12:31:57 PM JLL274